North Carolina, session 2025, HB780.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. FUNDS FOR ALL PRO DAD
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Family First, Inc., the nonprofit
corporation registered in the state of Florida, to expand its All Pro Dad fatherhood program in
this State, provided that (i) the nonprofit registers as an entity with the Secretary of State to
conduct business in the State and (ii) the nonprofit allocates the funds appropriated in this act to
*H780-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
expand its All Pro Dad program in North Carolina, including increasing All Pro Dad Chapters in
schools, holding events that encourage father-child engagement and foster improved
communication between children and fathers, and distributing resources to help fathers enhance
their parenting skills and become more involved in their children's lives.

PART II. RESPONSIBLE FATHERHOOD NC PROGRAM
SECTION 2.1. Article 2 of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new Part to read:
"Part 12. Responsible Fatherhood NC Act.
"§ 108A-70.60. Short title.
This act may be cited as the "Responsible Fatherhood NC Act."
"§ 108A-70.61. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Part:
(1) Department. – Refers to the Department of Health and Human Services.
(2) Program. – Refers to the Responsible Fatherhood NC program.
"§ 108A-70.62. Creation of the Responsible Fatherhood NC program; purpose.
(a) The General Assembly recognizes that families are stronger when both parents act
responsibly in caring for their children. It is the intent of the General Assembly to recognize and
support the important and unique role that fathers play in ensuring the physical, emotional, and
economic well-being of their children and families.
(b) The Department shall contract for the development and implementation of the
Responsible Fatherhood NC program. The program shall provide an opportunity for every father
in the State to be able to obtain information and inspiration that will motivate and enable him to
enhance his abilities as a father, recognizing that some fathers have greater challenges than others
and would benefit from greater support.
(c) The entity the Department contracts with to develop, implement, and manage the
program, "Program Manager," shall be a nonprofit organization that satisfies all of the following
criteria:
(1) Has a history of focusing on responsible fatherhood, including providing
online resources to fathers, and engaging fathers, father figures, and children
through community-based and school-based events to encourage responsible
fatherhood.
(2) Has the organizational capacity to manage a statewide initiative and
successfully carry out the requirements of this section.
(d) The Program Manager shall be solely responsible for developing, implementing, and
managing the program which shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:
(1) A statewide media campaign that increases the awareness and importance of
fathers being involved in their children's lives.
(2) Resources and information for fathers and father figures to increase
engagement and involvement in their children's lives.
(3) Promotion of related fatherhood programs that are provided by the
Department of Public Instruction, the Community College System, or The
University of North Carolina System.
(e) To most effectively use the funds appropriated to this program, the Program Manager
shall identify and use other existing media assets, content, and online resources it deems
appropriate, including any existing media assets, content, and online resources it has available,
to implement and execute the items required by this section.
"§ 108A-70.63. Grants to address the needs of fathers.
(a) The Department shall award grants to nonprofit community-based organizations to
address the needs of fathers. The Department shall award the following types of grants:
Page 2 House Bill 780-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Grants that comprehensively address the needs of fathers, such as assisting
them in finding employment, managing child support obligations,
transitioning from a period of incarceration, accessing health care,
understanding child development, and enhancing parenting skills. Services
provided shall be tailored to the needs of the father being served. Case
management services shall be provided to the fathers who are served by the
grants under this subdivision.
(2) Grants that provide evidence-based parenting education specifically for
fathers. The grants under this subdivision do not require case management
services.
(b) The Department shall prioritize applicants for a grant specified under subsection (a)
of this section based on all of the following:
(1) Need in a geographic area and the population to be served by the grant as
indicated by, at a minimum, all of the following:
a. Unemployment rates.
b. Incarceration rates.
c. Housing instability.
d. The number of single-parent households.
e. The number of public benefit recipients.
f. Graduation rates.
g. Levels of academic achievement.
(2) If an applicant has a primary mission of, or a history of a significant focus on
and effective work toward, addressing the needs of men in their role as fathers.
(3) Applicant current and historical involvement in the community being served.
(4) Applicant commitment and capability to employ competent staff who can
effectively engage with the fathers being served, including, at a minimum,
those individuals who share a similar background as the fathers being served.
(5) The number of individuals the applicant plans to serve through the grant and
the projected costs for the program.
(6) Applicant organizational capacity to effectively meet the requirements of the
grant and to deliver the programs proposed by the applicant. The Department
may offer technical assistance to applicants and grant recipients that have
lower organizational capacity as long as such organizations have, or the
organization's leadership has, significant experience serving fathers.
(c) Grants shall be awarded for no more than three years, with subsequent year funding
contingent on compliance with grant requirements and adequate performance. Grant recipients
shall submit reports to the Department in a format and at intervals prescribed by the Department."
SECTION 2.2. The Department has six months from the effective date of this act to
implement the requirements outlined in Section 2.1 of this act.
SECTION 2.3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services the sum of three million dollars ($3,000,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used to implement the provisions of Section 2.1 of this act.
Of the funds appropriated by this act, the Department shall use up to two million dollars
($2,000,000) to contract for the Program Manager as authorized in G.S. 108A-70.62. The
remainder of the funds shall be used for the grants authorized in G.S. 108A-70.63.

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
House Bill 780-Second Edition Page 3